src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_POIKA
!!€gt-norm: Nouns poika
!!€ poika: poika+N+Sg+Nom # boy
!!€ pojassa: poika+N+Sg+Ine
0:ika   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ja    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ik   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ika   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ik   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ik   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! !Noun forms of numerals with special inflection
!! The numerals are not really nouns in this morphology, for details see
!! [numeral-stems], but some of their compounds are nouns, and the following
!! classes are for those that have special stem or suffix patterns not
!! available with other nouns.
!!
!! The numerals 1 and 2 are in paradigm that is currently left with one other
!! noun, _haaksi_, so nominals with 2 go to that class but 1 gets a new class
!! for being front vowelled. 3 Has its own paradigm, 4 is like koira, 5
!! like hiisi and 6 like kausi.
!! The numerals 7, 8, 9 have their own paradigm, which, other than the
!! nominative having extra n at the end, is same as the tri-syllabic
!! a, ä stems, similarly 10 is quite like sisar with the extra en in nominative.

LEXICON N_AAMUYKSI
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals yksi
!!€ aamuyksi: aamuyksi+N+Sg+Nom 1 a.m.
!!€ aamuyhtä: aamuyksi+N+Sg+Par
!!€ aamuyhtenä: aamuyksi+N+Sg+Ess
0:ksi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:hte N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:hde N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:h     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:hte N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ks N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ksi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:hde   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_AAMUKOLME
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals kolme
!!€ aamukolme: aamukolme+N+Sg+Nom 3 a.m.
!!€ aamukolmea: aamukolme+N+Sg+Par
!!€ aamukolmeen: aamukolme+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ aamukolmia: aamukolme+N+Pl+Par
!!€ aamukolmien: aamukolme+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ aamukolmiin: aamukolme+N+Pl+Ill
0:e    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_AAMUKAHDEKSAN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals 8
!!€ aamukahdeksan: aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Nom 8 a.m.
!!€ aamukahdeksaa: aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Par
!!€ aamukahdeksana: aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ aamukahdeksassa: aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ aamukahdeksina: aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ aamukahdeksien: aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ aamukahdeksiin: aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Ill
0:an   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_AAMUYHDEKSÄN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals 9
!!€ aamuyhdeksän: aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Nom 9 a.m.
!!€ aamuyhdeksää: aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Par
!!€ aamuyhdeksänä: aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ aamuyhdeksässä: aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ aamuyhdeksinä: aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ aamuyhdeksien: aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ aamuyhdeksiin: aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Ill
0:än   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_AAMUKYMMENEN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals 10
!!€ aamukymmenen: aamukymmenen+N+Sg+Nom 10 a.m.
0:en    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0       N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:en    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VUOSITUHAT
!!€gt-norm: Nouns from numerals 1000
!!€ vuosituhat: vuosituhat+N+Sg+Nom # millennium
!!€ vuosituhantena: vuosituhat+N+Sg+Ess
0:t   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:nte N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:nne N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ns N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:nte N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ns N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ns N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:nne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ns   N_COMPOUND_IEN    ;

!! !Plurales tantum
!! For some words, the singular forms are rare, odd, or even deemed
!! ungrammatical, these words have separate classes for them. In Finnish
!! words to commonly be in this class are events like häät (wedding),
!! juhlat (party), etc. then all things that are semantically coupled,
!! like clothes with two somethings (as with English): farkut (jeans),
!! housut (pants). It is noteworthy, that sometimes dictionaries classify
!! common words as plurale tantum for semantic reasons: joukot (troops)
!! versus joukko (group). We don’t need that at this point.
!! The compounds of plurale tantum words are made from singular forms:
!! farkkukangas (jean fabric), hääjuhla (wedding party).

LEXICON N_AIVOT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1o plurt
!!€ aivot: aivot+N+Pl+Nom # brains
!!$ aivo: aivot+N+Sg+Nom
0    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_PÖKSYT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1y plurt
!!€ pöksyt: pöksyt+N+Pl+Nom # pants
!!$ pöksy: pöksyt+N+Sg+Nom
0    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HOUSUT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1u plurt
!!€ housut: housut+N+Pl+Nom # pants
!!$ housu: housut+N+Sg+Nom
0    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_JOUKOT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1ko plurt
!!€ huoltojoukot: huolto#joukot+N+Pl+Nom # troops
!!$ huoltojoukko: huolto#joukot+N+Sg+Nom
0:o       N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_FARKUT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1ku plurt
!!€ farkut: farkut+N+Pl+Nom # jeans
!!$ farkku: farkut+N+Sg+Nom
0:u       N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;


LEXICON N_TIEDOT
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1dot plurt
!!€ perustiedot: perus#tiedot+N+Pl+Nom knowledge (in school grades)
!!$ perustieto: perus#tiedot+N+Sg+Nom
0:do      N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:to      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:do       N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:to      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:to      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:do       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:to      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON  N
aamukahdeksan+N:aamukahdeks   N_AAMUKAHDEKSAN  ;
aamukolme+N:aamukolm   N_AAMUKOLME  ;
aamukymmenen+N:aamukymmen   N_AAMUKYMMENEN  ;
aamuseitsemän+N:aamuseitsem   N_AAMUYHDEKSÄN  ;
aamuyhdeksän+N:aamuyhdeks   N_AAMUYHDEKSÄN  ;
aamuyksi+N:aamuy   N_AAMUYKSI  ;
alkeistiedot+N:alkeis#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
arkiolot+N:arki#olo N_AIVOT  ;
bikinihousut+N:bikini#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
edustusmenot+N:edustus#meno N_AIVOT  ;
erauspoika+N:eraus#po   N_POIKA  ;
farkut+N:fark N_FARKUT  ;
farmarihousut+N:farmari#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
golfhousut+N:golf#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
hankintakulut+N:hankinta#kulu N_HOUSUT  ;
henkilötiedot+N:henkilö#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
herrakutsut+N:herra#kutsu N_HOUSUT  ;
hevoskärryt+N:hevos#kärry N_PÖKSYT  ;
hiekanmyyjäpoika+N:hiekanmyyjä#po N_POIKA  ;
hulivilipoika+N:hulivili#po N_POIKA  ;
hääkellot+N:hää#kello N_AIVOT  ;
ihmiskasvot+N:ihmis#kasvo N_AIVOT  ;
ikäkausikilpailut+N:ikäkausi#kilpailu N_HOUSUT  ;
ilmatorjuntajoukot+N:ilma#torjunta#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
jouluvalmistelut+N:joulu#valmistelu N_HOUSUT  ;
juhlamenot+N:juhla#meno N_AIVOT  ;
jäniksenpoika+N:jäniksenpo N_POIKA ;
kahvikutsut+N:kahvi#kutsu N_HOUSUT  ;
katupoika+N:katu#po N_POIKA  ;
katurata-ajot+N:katu#rata-ajo N_AIVOT  ;
kimpsut+N:kimpsu N_HOUSUT  ;
kissanpoika+N:kissan#po N_POIKA  ;
kodinturvajoukot+N:kodin#turva#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
kokonaismenot+N:kokonais#meno N_AIVOT  ;
kommandojoukot+N:kommando#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
kosintamenot+N:kosinta#meno N_AIVOT  ;
kottikärryt+N:kottikärry N_PÖKSYT  ;
kriisinhallintajoukot+N:kriisin#hallinta#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
kukonpoika+N:kukon#po N_POIKA  ;
kuoripoika+N:kuori#po N_POIKA  ;
kurahousut+N:kura#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
kuukasvot+N:kuu#kasvo N_AIVOT  ;
käsikärryt+N:käsi#kärry N_PÖKSYT  ;
laivapoika+N:laivapo N_POIKA ;
laskuvarjojoukot+N:lasku#varjo#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
lehdenmyyjäpoika+N:lehdenmyyjä#po N_POIKA  ;
lentojarrut+N:lento#jarru N_HOUSUT  ;
linnoitusjoukot+N:linnoitus#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
linnunpoika+N:linnun#po N_POIKA  ;
luentomuistiinpanot+N:luento#muistiinpano N_AIVOT  ;
luottotiedot+N:luotto#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
lämmityskulut+N:lämmitys#kulu N_HOUSUT  ;
lääkintäjoukot+N:lääkintä#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
maahanlaskujoukot+N:maahanlasku#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
maajoukot+N:maa#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
maalaisolot+N:maalais#olo N_AIVOT  ;
mammanpoika+N:mamman#po N_POIKA  ;
menkut+N:menk N_FARKUT  ;
merkkifarkut+N:merkki#fark N_FARKUT  ;
myrskyjoukot+N:myrsky#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
nahkahousut+N:nahka#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
nokipoika+N:noki#po N_POIKA  ;
normaaliolot+N:normaali#olo N_AIVOT  ;
orpopoika+N:orpopo N_POIKA ;
paikallisjoukot+N:paikallis#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
pakkauskulut+N:pakkaus#kulu N_HOUSUT  ;
pallopoika+N:pallo#po N_POIKA  ;
panssarijoukot+N:panssari#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
parrasvalot+N:parras#valo N_AIVOT  ;
perustiedot+N:perus#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
piiritysjoukot+N:piiritys#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
pikkuhousut+N:pikku#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
pikkupöksyt+N:pikku#pöksy N_PÖKSYT  ;
pillifarkut+N:pilli#fark N_FARKUT  ;
pioneerijoukot+N:pioneeri#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
pissapoika+N:pissa#po N_POIKA  ;
pohjatiedot+N:pohja#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
polkupyöräjoukot+N:polku#pyörä#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
potkuhousut+N:potku#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
puolustusmenot+N:puolustus#meno N_AIVOT  ;
pyykkipoika+N:pyykki#po N_POIKA  ;
pöksyt+N:pöksy N_PÖKSYT  ;
rajajoukot+N:raja#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
renkipoika+N:renki#po N_POIKA  ;
ruokamenot+N:ruoka#meno N_AIVOT  ;
ruumisvaunut+N:ruumis#vaunu N_HOUSUT  ;
salamenot+N:sala#meno N_AIVOT  ;
samettifarkut+N:samettifark N_FARKUT  ;
siirtomaajoukot+N:siirto#maa#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
soidinmenot+N:soidin#meno N_AIVOT  ;
sotavaunut+N:sota#vaunu N_HOUSUT  ;
sukulaispoika+N:sukulais#po N_POIKA  ;
suojajoukot+N:suoja#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
säätiedot+N:sää#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
taikamenot+N:taika#meno N_AIVOT  ;
talvifarkut+N:talvi#fark N_FARKUT  ;
terkut+N:terk N_FARKUT  ;
tonttupoika+N:tonttu#po N_POIKA  ;
tuhat+N:tuha   N_VUOSITUHAT  ;
tweedhousut+N:tweed#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
työntökärryt+N:työntökärry N_PÖKSYT  ;
uhrimenot+N:uhri#meno N_AIVOT  ;
urheilujoukot+N:urheilu#jouk N_JOUKOT  ;
verryttelyhousut+N:verryttely#housu N_HOUSUT  ;
vesipoika+N:vesi#po N_POIKA  ;
viestijoukot+N:viestijouk N_JOUKOT  ;
vuosituhat+N:vuosi#tuha   N_VUOSITUHAT  ;
väliaivot+N:väli#aivo N_AIVOT  ;
vällyt+N:välly N_PÖKSYT  ;
yhteystiedot+N:yhteys#tie N_TIEDOT  ;
